Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2028
Reciprocity; requirements; military spouse; temporary license.

(1) An applicant for a license to practice medicine and surgery based on a license in another state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia shall comply with the requirements of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact beginning on the effective date of the compact or meet the standards set by the board pursuant to section 38-126, except that an applicant who has not passed one of the licensing examinations specified in the rules and regulations but has been duly licensed to practice medicine and surgery in some other state or territory of the United States of America or in the District of Columbia and obtained that license based upon a state examination, as approved by the board, may be issued a license by the department, with the recommendation of the board, to practice medicine and surgery.

(2) An applicant who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 686;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 62.

Interstate Medical Licensure Compact, see section 38-3601.